dev/gsoc2011/monodix/noun/noun.bn.dix
    <pardef n="বোন__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>রা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="hu" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>দেরকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="hu" /><s n="pl" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টাকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টিকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ের</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>দের</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="hu" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টার</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টির</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="মে__n_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোর</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টার</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টির</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোয়</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টায়</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="দশা__n_nt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোর</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টার</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টির</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>য়</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোয়</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টায়</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="বোন"><i>বোন</i><par n="বোন__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="দেখানো"><i>দেখানো</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="আলোচনা"><i>আলোচনা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="সেঞ্চুরি"><i>সেঞ্চুরি</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="পাকানো"><i>পাকানো</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রতিযোগিতা"><i>প্রতিযোগিতা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ক্ষমতা"><i>ক্ষমতা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="কমিউনিটি"><i>কমিউনিটি</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রবণতা"><i>প্রবণতা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="পরিচিতি"><i>পরিচিতি</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="তল্লাশি"><i>তল্লাশি</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="জেলা"><i>জেলা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="সুবিধা"><i>সুবিধা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="হুমকি"><i>হুমকি</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সুতা"><i>সুতা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="উর্দু"><i>উর্দু</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সমবেদনা"><i>সমবেদনা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="আবৃত্তি"><i>আবৃত্তি</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="দিকনির্দেশনা"><i>দিকনির্দেশনা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="আমদানি"><i>আমদানি</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="পরমাণু"><i>পরমাণু</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সরানো"><i>সরানো</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="পাওনা"><i>পাওনা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="জড়ো"><i>জড়ো</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="নিষেধাজ্ঞা"><i>নিষেধাজ্ঞা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="তৈরি"><i>তৈরি</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সংখ্যালঘু"><i>সংখ্যালঘু</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ফোটানো"><i>ফোটানো</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="মুদ্রা"><i>মুদ্রা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="চুলকানো"><i>চুলকানো</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="শাড়ি"><i>শাড়ি</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সত্যি"><i>সত্যি</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="নৌকা"><i>নৌকা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="পার্টি"><i>পার্টি</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="কচলানো"><i>কচলানো</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বিবেচনা"><i>বিবেচনা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ডাকাতি"><i>ডাকাতি</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ভাষা"><i>ভাষা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="বিজ্ঞপ্তি"><i>বিজ্ঞপ্তি</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="মানানো"><i>মানানো</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="পৃষ্ঠপোষকতা"><i>পৃষ্ঠপোষকতা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="কর্মসূচি"><i>কর্মসূচি</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="দুর্গা"><i>দুর্গা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="জ্বালানি"><i>জ্বালানি</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="পড়া"><i>পড়া</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="যন্ত্রপাতি"><i>যন্ত্রপাতি</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="নকশা"><i>নকশা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="মাতৃভাষা"><i>মাতৃভাষা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="বদলানো"><i>বদলানো</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="আস্থা"><i>আস্থা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="বে"><i>বে</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="দোলানো"><i>দোলানো</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="দুর্বলতা"><i>দুর্বলতা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রীতি"><i>প্রীতি</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সোনা"><i>সোনা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="তথ্যপ্রযুক্তি"><i>তথ্যপ্রযুক্তি</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="মৃত্যু"><i>মৃত্যু</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="কথাবার্তা"><i>কথাবার্তা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="আড্ডা"><i>আড্ডা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="সময়সীমা"><i>সময়সীমা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="কান্না"><i>কান্না</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="বর্ষা"><i>বর্ষা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="জানাজা"><i>জানাজা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="স্বচ্ছতা"><i>স্বচ্ছতা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="সম্পাদনা"><i>সম্পাদনা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="গোলসংখ্যা"><i>গোলসংখ্যা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="মৌজা"><i>মৌজা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="পৃষ্ঠা"><i>পৃষ্ঠা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="মাদার"><i>মাদার</i><par n="বোন__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="বিভক্তি"><i>বিভক্তি</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বলবিদ্যা"><i>বলবিদ্যা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ঋতু"><i>ঋতু</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="পদার্থবিদ্যা"><i>পদার্থবিদ্যা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="আয়ু"><i>আয়ু</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="গারো"><i>গারো</i><par n="মে__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="আবর্জনা"><i>আবর্জনা</i><par n="দশা__n_nt"/></e>
